Utah statutes.
70A-9a-201.   General effectiveness of security agreement.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a security agreement is effective according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of the collateral, and against creditors.

(2) A transaction subject to this chapter is subject to:

(a)  any applicable rule of law which establishes a different rule for consumers; and

(b)  Title 70C, Utah Consumer Credit Code.

(3)  In case of conflict between this chapter and a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in Subsection (2), the rule of law, statute, or regulation controls.  Failure to comply with a statute or regulation described in Subsection (2) has only the effect the statute or regulation specifies.

(4) This chapter does not:

(a)  validate any rate, charge, agreement, or practice that violates a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in Subsection (2); or

(b)  extend the application of the rule of law, statute, or regulation to a transaction not otherwise subject to it.

